Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 3. Minor Political Parties

Constitutionality of former provisions governing minor party ballot access. —

The former provisions of the Wyoming Election Code governing minor party ballot access were unduly burdensome and, hence, unconstitutional. Blomquist v. Thomson, 591 F. Supp. 768, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19379 (D. Wyo.), rev'd, 739 F.2d 525,

1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 20277

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1984) (decided under pre-1984 version of former § 22-1-102(g) and prior to enactment of former §

22-4-201

et seq.).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes governing “minor political parties”, 120 ALR 5th 1.

§ 22-4-301.
Application of article.

This article is applicable only to minor political parties.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-4-302.
Composition and qualifications of minor party offices.

Each minor party shall provide for a sufficient number of officers to govern the party and shall have at least a state party chairman and a state party secretary. Each officer shall be a registered elector in the party. Officers shall be elected or appointed in accordance with party rules and bylaws.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1.

§ 22-4-303.
Nomination of candidates.

Minor parties may nominate candidates to be placed on the general election ballot only by party convention. Under no circumstances shall a minor political party nominate by the primary election process.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1.

§ 22-4-304.
Certification of candidates; fees.

The chairman and secretary of the state political convention shall certify to the secretary of state the names of its party’s nominees for United States senator, United States representative, all elective state offices and legislative offices.

The chairman and secretary of the state or county political convention shall certify to the county clerk the names of its party’s nominees for elected county offices and office of the district attorney.

The names certified to the secretary of state or the county clerk shall be filed no later than the day before the primary election.

Persons certified as nominees shall be members of that party, as shown by their affidavits of registration, at the time their names are certified to the secretary of state or the county clerk.

Each certification made under this section shall be accompanied by the same application and fee required for the same office of a candidate seeking nomination by primary election. A certification not accompanied by the application and fee is not valid.

History:

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), inserted “and” preceding “legislative,” and deleted “and office of district attorney” at the end; and in (b), added “and office of the district attorney” at the end.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-4-305.
Certification and filing of rules and bylaws.

The state party chairman and state party secretary shall certify all rules and bylaws promulgated, revoked or amended by the state convention and file them with the secretary of state within thirty (30) days after the adjournment of the state convention.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1.

§ 22-4-306.
Certification of presidential elector nominees and party officers.

The state party chairman and state party secretary shall certify the names of nominees for presidential electors and the name of the state and county party officers elected to the secretary of state immediately after the state convention.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-4-307.
Calling of state convention, contents of notice.

The state chairman shall call a state convention by filing notice in the office of the secretary of state and of each county clerk not later than twenty (20) days before the convention. The notice shall state the eligibility requirements for voting at the convention.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 1.